Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1236
Bridge commission; bonds of officers, depositories; insurance.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class, and in the absence of action by the city council, the bridge commission of such city, shall have the power to require bonds of officers and employees to require guarantees of deposited money and to insure the bridges and all property connected with such bridges against every manner of loss or injury.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 15, p. 625;

C.S.1929, § 14-1215;

R.S.1943, § 14-1236;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 269.
July 21, 2022